Hawaii statutes.
§486-5 Powers and duties of the
administrator, and inspectors. The administrator may delegate any of the
administrator's authority, powers and duties to the inspectors or other
measurement standards personnel when such delegation is deemed necessary for
the efficient and effective enforcement of the respective parts of this
chapter. [L 1988, c 156, pt of §3; gen ch 1992]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next